Hawaii statutes.
[§163D-11] Revenue bonds; interest rate,
price, and sale. (a) The revenue bonds issued pursuant to this chapter
shall bear interest at such rate or rates and shall be payable on such date or
dates, as the corporation shall determine.

(b) The corporation shall include the costs of
undertaking the project facility for which the revenue bonds are issued in
determining the principal amount of revenue bonds to be issued. In determining
the cost of undertaking the project facility, the corporation may include:

(1) The cost of constructing, acquiring, remodeling,
furnishing, and equipping the project facility, including the acquisition of
the site thereof;

(2) The cost of purchasing or funding loans or other
agreements entered into for the project facility;

(3) The costs of studies and surveys;

(4) Insurance premiums;

(5) Underwriting fees;

(6) Financial consultant, legal, accounting, and
marketing services incurred;

(7) Reserve account, trustee, custodian, and rating
agency fees; and

(8) Any capitalized interest.

(c) The revenue bonds may be sold at public or
private sale, and for a price as may be determined by the corporation. [L 1994,
c 264, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next